Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1151.1 Pilot program for lease
of public school land. (a) There shall be established within the
department a pilot program for the lease of public school land, including
facilities. The department, in consultation with the board of education and
any other appropriate agency, shall serve as the facilitator of the pilot
program.

(b) Notwithstanding sections 171-13 and 302A‑1151,
or any other law to the contrary, the department may lease public school land
on terms it deems appropriate, including a leaseback of all or a portion of the
improvements constructed; provided that:

(1) The board may identify and select up to five
public school land sites as candidates for participation in the pilot program;
provided that:

(A) During the identification and selection
process, the board shall be subject to chapter 92, shall hold at least one
public meeting in each affected community, and shall foster school and
community participation; and

(B) If the site is on land owned by the
county, the department shall consult with the county;

(2) The department may lease public school land for
no more than three public school land sites identified and selected by the
board pursuant to paragraph (1) under leases for a term of not more than
fifty-five years per lease, unless extended pursuant to section 171-36, to
lessees who shall be required to modify, construct, or utilize facilities to
benefit public educational purposes, in accordance with specific request for
proposal or request for information guidelines;

(3) Each lease shall stipulate that the lessee may
retain any revenue generated from the facilities; provided that:

(A) The lessee shall be obligated to maintain
and operate the facilities to benefit public educational purposes for the
length of the lease;

(B) The lessee shall be obligated to pay to
the county all applicable property tax on the value of any improvements;

(C) A leasehold premium may be charged to the
lessee for the right to use the public school land based on a competitive
process that complies with applicable sections of chapter 103D;

(D) Upon the expiration of the lease, the
facilities shall revert to the department; and

(E) All revenues and proceeds derived by the
State under this section shall be deposited in the school facilities subaccount
pursuant to section 302A-1151.2; and

(4) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
department may enter into leaseback agreements that allow the department to
lease or sublease the property to a third party. The department may lease back
the property from the third-party lessee or sublessee for a contractual period
of time, after which the department shall own any improvements.

(c) Any redevelopment involving nonschool
purposes shall:

(1) Comply with county plans, ordinances, and zoning
and development codes; and

(2) Acquire all required government approvals and
permits.

(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude the
department from working with and receiving assistance from any other department
or agency in carrying out the purposes of this section.

(e) Any lease entered into by the department
pursuant to subsection (b) shall be fully executed no later than five years
from July 1, 2013.

(f) For purposes of this section, public
educational purposes shall include but are not limited to:

(1) A new revenue source from the redevelopment of
one or more underutilized department facilities;

(2) New construction of department facilities or
renovation of existing, underutilized department facilities into a twenty-first
century school; or

(3) A combination of paragraphs (1) and (2). [L
2013, c 155, pt of §2; am L 2015, c 115, §1]

Note

Public school land pilot program; reports to legislature
until completion of projects. L 2013, c 155, §4.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next